Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Construction labor contractor” and  “labor contractor” have the meanings given
those terms in ORS 658.405.
(b) “Unlicensed  construction labor contractor” means a person who performs the activ-
ities of a construction labor contractor without  a valid license or license indorsement issued
under ORS 658.405 to 658.511.
(c) “Unlicensed labor contractor” means a person acting as  labor contractor without a
valid license or indorsement issued under ORS 658.405 to 658.511.
(2)(a) For the period beginning on January  1, 2027, and ending on July 1, 2027, the Con-
struction Contractors Board shall consult and collaborate with the Bureau  of Labor and In-
dustries to carry out a targeted assessment initiative as described in this section.
(b) The purpose of the targeted assessment  initiative is to observe and collect informa-
tion that may be used to determine the:
(A) Frequency with which the services of  unlicensed labor contractors, including but not
limited to unlicensed construction labor contractors, are used on construction job  sites; and
(B) Prevalence of unlicensed construction labor contractors at construction job sites.
(3)(a) To carry  out the targeted assessment initiative, the board may, during a job site
inspection conducted pursuant to the board’s existing authority under ORS 701.225, engage
in the following activities:
(A) Screening for the presence of unlicensed construction labor contractors at the site;
(B) Observing and documenting activities and practices suspected  to violate ORS 658.405
to 658.511 or ORS chapter 701;
(C) Identifying educational opportunities for improving compliance with ORS  658.405 to
658.511; and
(D) Sharing recorded observations and information with the bureau.
(b) Nothing in this subsection:
(A) Creates new violations or penalties beyond those prescribed under  ORS 658.405 to
658.511 and ORS chapter 701.
(B) May  be construed to limit the authority of the board or the bureau to exercise their
respective enforcement authority under ORS 658.405 to 658.511 and ORS chapter 701.
Enrolled House Bill 4012 (HB 4012-A) Page 1
(4) No later than  December 31, 2026, the board and the bureau shall consult and coordi-
nate to complete planning necessary for the board to begin conducting the targeted assess-
ment initiative at the beginning  of the period specified in subsection (2) of this section.
Planning activities must include:
(a) Development of strategies and methods for:
(A) Engaging in the activities authorized for purposes of conducting the targeted as-
sessment initiative;
(B) Screening to identify and verify unlicensed labor contractors  and unlicensed con-
struction labor contractors at construction job sites;
(C) Identifying common indicators of suspected noncompliance  with the provisions of
ORS 658.405 to 658.511 and ORS chapter 701; and
(D) Recording, documenting and sharing observations and information obtained through
engaging in the activities authorized for purposes of conducting the targeted assessment in-
itiative; and
(b) Consultation with persons possessing  relevant subject matter knowledge and exper-
tise regarding the requirements under ORS 658.405 to 658.511.
(5)(a) The board and the bureau may compare and exchange documents, data  and other
information, including documents, data or information that are  otherwise confidential under
ORS 192.311 to 192.478,  as necessary for the board and the bureau to carry out their re-
spective powers in connection with:
(A) Conducting a targeted assessment initiative; or
(B) Enforcement under ORS 658.405 to 658.511 or ORS chapter 701.
(b) The exchange of documents, data and other information under this  subsection does
not waive or diminish the  confidentiality or exempt status of the information in possession
of the board or the bureau and the information  shall remain confidential or exempt from
disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(6) Before the board  begins carrying out the targeted assessment initiative described in
subsection (2) of this  section, the board shall provide written notice to licensees and appli-
cants under ORS chapter 701 informing them of the upcoming initiative. The notice must:
(a) Specify the period during which  the board will carry out the targeted assessment in-
itiative; and
(b) Include information  regarding the requirements applicable to construction labor
contractors under ORS 658.405 to 658.511.
(7) No later than October 1, 2027, the board and the bureau shall  report to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related  to business and labor on the operation and
outcomes of the targeted assessment initiative, including any recommendations regarding:
(a) Improving coordination and  effectiveness of enforcement under ORS 658.405 to
658.511;
(b) Improving education and  outreach regarding the requirements of ORS 658.405 to
658.511, including consideration of incorporating information about such requirements into
application materials, examinations or  continuing education requirements for persons li-
censed under ORS chapter 701;
(c) Clarification of  the licensure requirements under ORS chapter 701 and the licensure
and registration  requirements applicable to construction labor contractors under ORS
658.405 to 658.511;
(d) Gaps in current laws and regulations relating to construction labor contractors; and
(e) Potential statutory  changes to address the topics described in paragraphs (a) to (d)
of this subsection.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 3. This 2026 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 4012 (HB 4012-A) Page 2
Passed by House February 10, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate February 25, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4012 (HB 4012-A) Page 3